fr: Convient au type d’œuf: Poulet; Canard; Émeu; Oie; Perdrix; Paon; Faisan; Caille; Dinde; Autre
cs: Vhodné pro typ vejce: Kuřecí maso; Kachna; Emu; Husa; Koroptev; Pávice; Bažant; Křepelka; Krůtí maso; Jiné
zh-TW: 適用蛋類型: 雞肉; 鴨子; 鴯; 鵝; 鷓鴣; 孔雀; 雉雞; 鵪鶉; 火雞肉; 其他
bg-BG: Подходящ за тип яйца: Пиле; Патица; Ему; Гъска; Яребица; Паун; Фазан; Пъдпъдък; Пуйка; Други
it: Adatto per il tipo di uovo: Pollo; Anatra; Emu; Oca; Pernice; Pavone; Fagiano; Quaglia; Tacchino; Altro
el: Κατάλληλο για τύπο αυγού: Κοτόπουλο; Για το χιόνι; Είδος στρουθοκαμήλου; Χήνα; Πέρδικα; Παγώνι; Φασιανός; Ορτύκι; Γαλοπούλα; Άλλο
ro-RO: Potrivit pentru tipul de ouă: Pui; Rață; Emu; Gâscă; Potârniche; Păun; Fazan; Prepeliță; Curcan; Altele
nb: Egnet for eggtype: Kylling; And; Emu; Gås; Rapphøne; Påfugl; Fasan; Vaktel; Kalkun; Annet
pt-PT: Adequado para tipo de ovo: Frango; Pato; Emu; Ganso; Perdiz; Pavão; Faisão; Codorniz; Peru; Outro
th: เหมาะกับประเภทไข่: ไก่; เป็ด; นกอีมู; ห่าน; นกกระทา; นกยูง; ไก่ฟ้า; นกคุ่ม; ตุรกี; อื่นๆ
ru: Для какого типа яиц: Курица; Утка; Эму; Гусь; Куропатка; Павлин; Фазан; Перепелка; Индейка; Другое
hu: Tojástípus: Csirke; Kacsa; Emu; Liba; Fogoly; Páva; Fácán; Fürj; Pulyka; Egyéb
sk-SK: Vhodné pre typ vajec: Sliepka; Kačka; Emu; Hus; Jarabica; Páv; Bažant; Prepelica; Moriak; Iné
de: Geeignet für Eierart: Hähnchen; Ente; Emu; Gans; Rebhuhn; Pfau; Fasan; Wachtel; Truthahn; Sonstiges
sv: Lämplig för äggtyp: Kyckling; Anka; Emu; Gås; Rapphöna; Påfågel; Fasan; Vaktel; Kalkon; Övrigt
pt-BR: Adequado para o tipo de ovo: Galinha; Pato; Emu; Ganso; Perdiz; Pavão; Faisão; Codorna; Peru; Outro
pl: Odpowiednie do rodzaju jajka: Kurczak; Kaczka; Emu; Gęś; Kuropatwa; Paw; Bażant łowny; Przepiórka; Indyk; Inne
zh-CN: 适用的蛋类型: 鸡肉; 鸭蛋; 鸸鹋蛋; 鹅蛋; 鹧鸪蛋; 孔雀蛋; 野鸡蛋; 鹌鹑蛋; 火鸡肉; 其他
en: Suitable for egg type: Chicken; Duck; Emu; Goose; Partridge; Peafowl; Pheasant; Quail; Turkey; Other
ja: 卵型に適している: 鶏肉; ダック; エミュー; ガチョウ; パートリッジ; クジャク; キジ; ウズラ; 七面鳥; その他
tr: Yumurta türüne uygun: Tavuk; Ördek; Emu; Kaz; Keklik; tavus kuşu; Sülün; Bıldırcın; Hindi; Diğer
lt-LT: Tinka kiaušinių rūšiai: Vištos; Anties; Emu; Žąsies; Kurapkų; Povų; Fazanų; Putpelių; Kalakutų; Kita
vi: Phù hợp với loại trứng: Gà; Vịt; Đà điểu Emu; Ngỗng; Chim đa đa; Công; Gà lôi; Chim cút; Gà tây; Khác
sl-SI: Primerno za vrsto jajc: Piščanec; Raca; Emu; Gos; Jerebica; Pav; Fazan; Prepelica; Puran; Drugo
nl: Type geschikt voor ei: Kip; Eend; Emu; Gans; Patrijs; Peafowl; Fazant; Kwartel; Kalkoen; Andere
es: Adecuado para el tipo de huevo: Pollo; Pato; Emú; Ganso; Perdiz; Pavo real; Faisán; Codorniz; Pavo; Otros
fi: Sopii munatyypille: Kana; Ankka; Emu; Hanhi; Peltopyy; Riikinkukko; Fasaani; Viiriäinen; Kalkkuna; Muu
da: Velegnet til ægtype: Kylling; And; Emu; Gås; Agerhøne; Påfugl; Fasan; Vagtel; Kalkun; Andet
ko: 계랸 타입에 적합: 닭고기; 오리; Emu; 거위; 자고새; 공작; 꿩; 메추라기; 칠면조; 기타
hr-HR: Vrsta jaja za koja je prikladno: Kokoš; Patka; Emu; Guska; Jarebica; Paun; Fazan; Prepelica; Purica; Ostalo